bg-BG: Твърдост на косъма: Екстра мек; Твърд; Средна; Мека; Други
pt-PT: Dureza das cerdas: Extra suave; Duro; Moagem média; Suave; Outro
de: Borstenhärte: Extraweich; Hart; Mittel; Weich; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Duritate perilor: Extra-moale; Dur; Medie; Moale; Altele
es: Dureza de las cerdas: Extra suave; Duro; Medio; Blando; Otros
nl: Hardheid borstelharen: Extra zacht; Hard; Medium; Zacht; Andere
el: Σκληρότητα τριχών: Εξαιρετικά μαλακό; Σκληρή; Μέση; Μαλακό; Άλλο
it: Durezza delle setole: Extra morbido; Dura; Medio; Morbida; Altro
da: Børstehårens hårdhed: Ekstra blød; Hård; Medium; Blød; Andet
lt-LT: Šerelių kietumas: Ypač minkšti; Kietas; Vidutinis; Švelnus; Kita
sl-SI: Trdota ščetin: Zelo mehke; Močna; Medij; Mehka; Drugo
ja: 毛の硬さ: 極やわらかめ; ハード; 中挽き; ソフト; その他
sk-SK: Tvrdosť štetín: Extra mäkké; Tvrdý; Stredný; Mäkký; Iné
th: ความแข็งของขนแปรง: นุ่มพิเศษ; แข็ง; ปานกลาง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
sv: Borsthårdhet: Extra mjuk; Hård; Medium; Mjuk; Övrigt
vi: Độ cứng lông bàn chải: Siêu mềm; Cứng; Vừa; Mềm; Khác
cs: Tvrdost vláken: Extra měkké; Tvrdá; Střední; Měkká; Jiné
fi: Harjaksen kovuus: Erittäin pehmeä; Kova; Keskimääräinen; Pehmeä; Muu
zh-TW: 刷毛硬度: 極軟; 硬; 中等; 柔軟; 其他
nb: Busthardhet: Ekstra myk; Hard; Middels; Myk; Annet
hr-HR: Tvrdoća vlakana: Ekstra mekana; Tvrdi; Polusuho; Meka; Ostalo
zh-CN: 刷毛硬度: 超软; 硬; 中度; 软; 其他
ko: 칫솔모 강도: 매우 부드러움; 하드; 중간; 부드러움; 기타
hu: Sörtekeménység: Extra lágy; Kemény; Közepes; Lágy; Egyéb
fr: Dureté des poils: Extra-doux; Difficile; Moyen; Doux; Autre
pt-BR: Dureza das cerdas: Extra macio; Duro; Médio; Macio; Outro
tr: Kıl sertliği: Ekstra yumuşak; Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Diğer
pl: Twardość włosia: Bardzo miękkie; Twardy; Średni; Miękki; Inne
ru: Жесткость щетины: Экстра мягкая; Жесткий; Средний; Мягкий; Другой
en: Bristle hardness: Extra-soft; Hard; Medium; Soft; Other